Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2922
Audit.

The investment program shall cause an annual independent audit of all financial activities, including loan portfolios, investment earnings, debt obligations, and fund transfers. The audit shall be performed by a certified public accounting firm in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 22.
July 18, 2026